California statutes. Education Code
(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 7522.04 of the Government Code, “member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013” means a person who first becomes employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program on or after January 1, 2013.

(b) A member as defined in subdivision (a) does not include a person who was a member on or before December 31, 2012, of the California Public Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislators’ Retirement System, the University of California Retirement System, a county retirement system established under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government
 Code, or the San Francisco Employees’ Retirement System, and the person performed service in the other retirement system within the six months prior to the commencement of creditable service under the Defined Benefit Program.

(c) This section shall be deemed to have become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 9.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

22146.5.

“Membership” means membership in the Defined Benefit Program, except as otherwise specifically provided in this part. The board shall have final authority for determining membership in the system, considering the conditions under which persons may be admitted to and receive benefits from the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 239, Sec. 3.   (SB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22146.7.

“Minimum interest rate” means the annual interest rate determined by the board by plan amendment at which interest shall be credited to Defined Benefit Supplement accounts for a plan year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.   See identical section added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021.)
-------------------------------------------

22146.7.

“Minimum interest rate” means the annual interest rate determined by the board by plan amendment at which interest shall be credited to Defined Benefit Supplement accounts for a plan year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22147.

(a) “Month” means 20 working days or four weeks of five working days each, including legal holidays, with respect to the computation and crediting of service.

(b) “Month,” for all other purposes, means a period commencing on any day of a calendar month and extending through the day preceding the corresponding day of the succeeding calendar month, if there is any such corresponding day, and if not, through the last day of the succeeding calendar month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22147.5.

“Nonqualified service” means any time during which a member did not perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan. Nonqualified service shall not include time for which the member is eligible to purchase credit pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 22800), Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820), or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 22850).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22148.

“Normal retirement” and “normal retirement age” mean 60 years of age, or 62 years of age for a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013, which is the age upon attainment of which the member becomes eligible under the Defined Benefit Program for a service retirement allowance without reduction because of age and without special qualifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 10.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

22149.

(a) “Option beneficiary” means the person or trust designated by a member to receive a retirement allowance under the Defined Benefit Program upon the member’s death.

(b) For purposes of this section, “trust” means an irrevocable trust with the following characteristics:

(1) The trust satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 1396p of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The trust satisfies the requirements of Section 1.401(a)(9)-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) The trust, or the account in a pooled trust, is for the sole benefit of a single beneficiary and other beneficiaries to the trust, if any, are successor beneficiaries.

(4) The beneficiary of the trust who is beneficiary with respect to the trust’s interest in the member’s benefit shall be considered the designated option beneficiary for the purpose of determining eligibility for, and the amount and duration of, benefits under the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22150.

“Other public systems” means any of the following:

(a) Old age, survivors, disability, and health insurance program, other than the lump-sum death payment, provided by the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.A. Sec. 300 and following).

(b) The federal civil service retirement program.

(c) Federal military disability.

(d) Railroad retirement.

(e) A workers’ compensation program.

(f) Federal railroad retirement.

(g) Any other public retirement system, including, but not limited to, any disability programs financed from public funds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22152.

“Parent” means a natural parent of a member or a parent who adopted the member prior to his or her attainment of 18 years of age or to the member’s marriage, whichever occurs earlier.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22154.

“Pay period” means a payroll period of not less than four weeks or more than one calendar month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22155.

“Payroll” includes registers, warrants, and any other documents upon which the employer identifies persons to whom compensation is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 482, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22155.5.

“Plan” means the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.

“Plan vesting,” with respect to benefits payable under the Defined Benefit Program, means the member has met the credited service requirement for receipt of a benefit, and has a right to receive the benefit at a future date provided all other conditions required to receive the benefit are also met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.05.

“Plan year” means the period of time beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year. For purposes of the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, the board shall designate by plan amendment the initial plan year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.07.

(a) Except as otherwise provided under this part, “position subject to membership” means the following:

(1) A position at a county office of education or school district, not including a charter school, that the governing body of the employer has designated in a resolution adopted at a public meeting as a position subject to membership for which the employer requires the holding of a valid credential, license, or certificate authorized by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or the State Department of Health Care Services. The resolution must be in effect on the date of hire in the position or be effective retroactively to include the position as of the date of
 hire, whichever is later, but no earlier than the operative date of this section as determined by subdivision (c).

(2) A position at a county office of education or school district, including a charter school, that is included in a certificated bargaining unit represented by an exclusive representative, whether by agreement between the exclusive representative and the employer as reflected in a collective bargaining agreement or by written decision of the Public Employment Relations Board. The collective bargaining agreement must be in effect on the date of hire in the position or be effective retroactively to include the position as of the date of hire, whichever is later, but no earlier than the operative date of this section as determined by subdivision (c).

(3) A
 position at a charter school eligible to receive state apportionment where the position requires the holding of a Commission on Teacher Credentialing certificate, permit, or other document pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 47605.

(4) A position at a community college district, that is any of the following:

(A) A faculty member, as defined in Section 87003, subject to the appropriate minimum standards adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Section 87356.

(B) An academic position, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 87001, subject to the appropriate minimum standards adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Section
 87356.

(C) An educational administrator, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 87002, subject to the appropriate minimum standards adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Section 87356.

(D) A position pursuant to a contract with the United States Department of Defense to provide vocational training as an employee of a community college employer.

(5) A position as a superintendent of a California public school.

(6) A position that would otherwise be subject to membership in a different public retirement system when held by a member who has elected coverage by the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to Chapter 10
 (commencing with Section 22500).

(b) “Position subject to membership” does not mean and shall not include:

(1) A position that would otherwise be subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program when held by a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who has elected coverage in the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22500).

(2) A position that is not employed by an employer or employing agency as defined in Section 22131.

(3) A position at a county office of education or school district, including a charter school, that is included in a noncertificated bargaining unit represented by an exclusive
 representative, whether by agreement between the exclusive representative and the employer as reflected in a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the date of hire in the position or by written decision of the Public Employment Relations Board. 

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by
 the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 12.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.08.

(a) “Position subject to membership” shall also include the following positions in which a member performed creditable service before the operative date of Section 22156.07 provided that the same member remains continuously employed to perform service in that position on and after the operative date of Section 22156.07:

(1) A position in which the member performed creditable service pursuant to Section 22119.5, as that section read before the operative date of Section 22156.07.

(2) A position in which the member performed the activities described in subdivision (a) of Section 22119.6.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a member who becomes employed by the same or a different employer in a new position on or after the operative date of this section, and the member shall be subject to Section 22156.07. 

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative
 on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 13.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.1.

“Present value,” for purposes of Section 22718, means the amount of money needed on the effective date of retirement to reimburse the system for the actuarially determined cost of the portion of a member’s retirement allowance attributable to unused excess sick leave days. The present value on the effective date of retirement shall equal the number of unused excess sick leave days divided by the number of base days, as defined in Section 22106.2, multiplied by the prior year’s compensation earnable multiplied by the present value factor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 5.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.2.

“Present value factor,” for purposes of Section 22156.1, means an overall average rate based upon the demographics of members who recently retired under the Defined Benefit Program and regular interest that shall determine present value on the effective date of retirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22156.5.

“Prior year’s compensation earnable” means the compensation earnable for the most recent school year in which the member earned service credit that precedes the last school year in which the member earned service credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22157.

“Projected final compensation” means the final compensation used in computing the disability or family allowance increased by 2 percent, compounded annually to the earlier of normal retirement age or the date the disability allowance is terminated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22158.

(a) “Projected service” means the sum of credited service plus the credited service that would have been earned for the school years during which a disability allowance was payable if the member had performed creditable service during that time.

(b) Projected service for a school year shall be determined on the basis of the highest credited service earned by the member during any one of the three school years immediately preceding the member’s death or the date the disability allowance began to accrue.

(c) Projected service shall not include credited service for which contributions have been credited to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22159.

“Proof of death” means providing to the system any evidence of death required by the system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22160.

“Provisional vesting” means the member has reached the minimum age requirement and has attained the credited service required under the Defined Benefit Program for eligibility to receive a retirement allowance, and the member is entitled to terminate employment and retire at any time to receive a retirement allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22160.5.

“Public employer” means a public employer as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 7522.04 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 11.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.

“Public school” means any day or evening elementary school, any day or evening secondary school, community college, technical school, kindergarten school, and prekindergarten school established by the Legislature, or by municipal or district authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.3.

Qualified military service is military service as defined in Section 414(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 1.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.5.

“Refund” means the lump-sum return of a member’s accumulated retirement contributions under the Defined Benefit Program and does not include the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.

“Regular interest” means interest that is equal to the actuarially assumed rate of return on investments on assets of the Defined Benefit Program. The regular interest rate shall be adopted annually by the board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 2010.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   (AB 654)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative July 1, 2010, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.5.

“Regular meeting” means a meeting of the board held in accordance with a schedule of meetings that states the dates and places of the meetings and that is adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22163.

“Reinstatement” means the change in status with respect to the Defined Benefit Program under this part from a disabled or retired member to an active or inactive member and termination of one of the following:

(a) A service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208.

(b) A disability retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24117.

(c) A disability allowance pursuant to Section 24004, 24006, or 24015.

(d) A service retirement allowance or disability retirement allowance pursuant to Section 23404.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22164.

“Replacement benefits program” means the program established pursuant to Chapter 27.5 (commencing with Section 24250) in compliance with the provisions of Section 415(m) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 415(m)) as applicable to a governmental plan, as defined in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 414(d)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 465, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22164.5.

(a) “Retired member activities” means one or more activities identified in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 22119.5 or subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 26113 within the California public school system and performed by a member retired for service under this part as one of the following:

(1) An employee of an employer.

(2) An employee of a third party, except as specified in subdivision (b).

(3) An independent contractor.

(b) The activities of an employee of a third party shall not be included
 in the definition of “retired member activities” if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The employee performs an assignment of 24 months or less.

(2) The third-party employer does not participate in a California public pension system.

(3) The activities performed by the individual are not normally performed by employees of an employer, as defined in Section 22131.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 782, Sec. 7.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22165.

“Retirement” means termination of employment subject to coverage by the plan and a change in status from an inactive member, an active member, or a disabled member to a retired member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22166.

“Retirement allowance” means the amount payable to a retired member or an option beneficiary on a monthly basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22166.5.

“Retirement benefit” means the amount payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, based on the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account, to a member who has retired for service under the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22167.

“Retirement fund” means the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22168.

“Return on investments” means income received or receivable from the system’s investments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22168.5.

“School term” means a minimum period of 35 weeks beginning the first day and ending the last day creditable service is required to be performed by a member employed on a full-time basis, excluding any period that has been excluded pursuant to a publicly available written contractual agreement. The school term shall also be the same for a member who is not employed on a full-time basis who is performing the same duties as a member employed on a full-time basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 10.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22169.

“School year” means the period of time beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 7.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22170.

(a) “Service” means work performed for compensation in a position subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program, except as otherwise specifically provided in this part, providing the contributions on compensation for that work are not credited to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(b) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1,
 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 14.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 15 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22170.

(a) “Service” means work performed for compensation, except as otherwise specifically provided in this part.

(b) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative
 on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 15.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22170.5.

(a) “Sick leave days” means the number of days of accumulated and unused leave of absence for illness or injury granted by each employer.

(b) “Basic sick leave day” means the days of paid leave of absence due to illness or injury granted by each employer that are not excess sick leave days.

(c) “Excess sick leave days” means the day or total number of days of paid leave of absence due to illness or injury granted by each employer in excess of 12 days per school year.

(d) For those standards identified in
 Section 22138.5 that are expressed only in terms of hours, the number of hours shall be divided by six to determine the number of days pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 6.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22171.

(a) “Spouse” means a person who was continuously married to the member for the period beginning at least 12 months prior to the death of the member, unless a child is born to the member and the member’s spouse within the 12-month period or unless the spouse is carrying a fetus, conceived with the member.

(b) “Spouse” also means a person who was married to the member for less than 12 months, if the member’s death was either accidental, or due to an illness, and the marriage took place prior to the occurrence of the injury or diagnosis of the illness that resulted in death.

(1) A member’s death is defined as accidental only if the member received bodily injuries
 through violent, external, or accidental means and died as a direct result of the bodily injuries and independent of all other causes.

(2) This subdivision does not apply if, at the time of the marriage, the member could not have reasonably been expected to live for 12 months.

(c) Except as excluded by Sections 22661 and 23812, a person who is the registered domestic partner of a member, as established pursuant to Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, shall be treated in the same manner as a spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 10.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.

“Survivor allowance” means the allowance provided for in Section 23804 as it read under the law in effect on June 30, 1972.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22173.

“Survivor benefit allowance” means the monthly allowance that a surviving spouse may elect to receive pursuant to Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 23850).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22174.

“System” means the State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22175.

“System’s headquarters office” means the office building established as the permanent headquarters facility for the system, pursuant to Section 22375.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 5.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22176.

“Termination benefit” means a benefit equal in amount to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account that is payable to the member in a lump-sum when the member has terminated all employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22177.

(a) “Unfunded actuarial obligation,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, means that portion of the actuarial present value of benefits that is not provided for by future, normal costs or covered by the actuarial value of assets attributable to the Defined Benefit Program, based on assumptions adopted by the board pursuant to Section 22311.5.

(b) “Unfunded actuarial obligation,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, means that portion of the actuarial present value of benefits that is not provided for by future, normal costs or covered by the actuarial value of assets attributable to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, based on assumptions adopted by the board pursuant to Section 22311.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Retirement Board [22200. - 22228.]

22200.

(a) The plan and the system are administered by the Teachers’ Retirement Board. On and after January 1, 2004, the members of the board are as follows:

(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(2) The Controller.

(3) The Treasurer.

(4) The Director of Finance.

(5) Three persons who are either members of the Defined Benefit Program or participants in the Cash Balance Benefit Program, as follows:

(A) One person who, at the time of election, is an active member of the Defined Benefit Program or an active participant of the Cash Balance Benefit Program employed by a school district that provides instruction for prekindergarten, kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or a county office of education, in a position other than a school administrator that requires a services credential with a specialization in administrative services. This member shall be elected by the active members of the Defined Benefit Program and active participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program who are employed by a school district that provides instruction for prekindergarten, kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or county office of education, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, for a four-year term commencing on January 1, 2004.

(B) One person who, at the time of election, is an active member of the Defined Benefit Program or an active participant of the Cash Balance Benefit Program employed by a school district that provides instruction for prekindergarten, kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or a county office of education. This member shall be elected by the active members of the Defined Benefit Program and active participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program who are employed by a school district that provides instruction for prekindergarten, kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or a county office of education, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, for a four-year term commencing on January 1, 2004.

(C) One person who, at the time of election, is a community college instructor and an active member of the Defined Benefit Program or an active participant of the Cash Balance Benefit Program employed by a community college district, who shall be elected by the active community college members of the Defined Benefit Program and the active community college participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, for a four-year term commencing on January 1, 2004.

(6) Five persons appointed by the Governor for a term of four years, subject to confirmation by the Senate, as follows:

(A) One person who, at the time of appointment, is a member of the governing board of a school district or a community college district.

(B) One person who is either a retired member under this part or a retired participant under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(C) Three persons representing the public, whose terms shall be staggered by varying the first terms of these members, as follows:

(i) One person to a term expiring December 31, 2005.

(ii) One person to a term expiring December 31, 2006.

(iii) One person to a term expiring December 31, 2007.

(b) A person who is employed to perform creditable service by a community college district and either a school district that provides instruction for prekindergarten, kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or a county office of education, may only be elected to the position on the board that corresponds to the position in which he or she accrued the most service credit during the prior school year.

(c) The members of the board shall annually elect a chairperson and vice chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 323, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22200.5.

(a) The board shall conduct the elections of members described in Section 22200 pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.

(b) The board shall hold special elections to fill vacancies that occur during the term of the elected members of the board. If, at the time a vacancy occurs, the unexpired term is less than two years, the new member elected to fill the vacancy shall hold office for a period equal to the remainder of the term of the vacated office plus four years.

(c) The regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section and Section 22200 shall not be subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The regulations adopted by the board shall provide that the elections be conducted in the most cost-effective manner deemed feasible. The board, where practicable, shall consolidate election mailings with other mailings and shall address any other feasible cost-saving measures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1049, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.

(a) The board shall set policy and shall have the sole power and authority to hear and determine all facts pertaining to application for benefits under the plan or any matters pertaining to administration of the plan and the system.

(b) The board shall meet at least once every calendar quarter at such times as it may determine. The meetings shall be presided over by the chairperson. In the event of the chairperson’s absence from a meeting the vice chairperson shall act as presiding officer and perform all other duties of the chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.2.

A quorum of the board shall consist of the majority of the board members. In determining whether or not a quorum is present, vacant positions on the board shall not be considered. The concurrence of the majority of the board members present shall be necessary to the validity of any action taken by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.3.

The chief executive officer of the system shall act as secretary of the board and shall have charge of all board correspondence and shall keep a record of board proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22202.

The board has exclusive control of the administration of the funds. No transfers or disbursements of any amount from the funds shall be made except upon the authorization of the board for the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22203.

The board has exclusive control of the investment of the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. Except as otherwise restricted by the California Constitution and by law, the board may in its discretion invest the assets of the fund through the purchase, holding, or sale thereof of any investment, financial instrument, or financial transaction when the investment, financial instrument, or financial transaction is prudent in the informed opinion of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22203.5.

(a) All investment transaction decisions made during a closed session, pursuant to paragraph (16) of subdivision (c) of Section 11126 of the Government Code, shall be by rollcall vote entered into the minutes of that meeting.

(b) The board, within 12 months of the close of an investment transaction or the transfer of system assets for an investment transaction, whichever occurs first, shall disclose and report the investment at a public meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 859, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22204.

Each member of the board may administer oaths and affirmations to witnesses and others transacting the business of the system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22205.

The board has the authority to negotiate, and enter into agreements with other states of the United States on the subject of the transfer of members’ contributions and regular interest between the retirement systems of California and other states.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22206.

(a) As often as the board determines necessary, it may audit or cause to be audited the records of any public agency.

(b) The board may excuse any audit finding provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The audit finding relates to a period of time prior to July 1, 2002.

(2) The audit finding identifies an issue that is not in compliance with the provisions of this part with respect to creditable service or creditable compensation.

(3) The noncompliance would not have existed if the service and compensation crediting changes that shall become operative on July 1, 2002, as a result of legislation enacted during the second year of the 1999–2000 Regular Session, had been operative during the period of time investigated in the audit.

(4) The audit finding was included in an audit report issued on or after January 1, 2001.

(5) Excusing the audit finding will not have an adverse effect on the integrity of the retirement fund.

(c) The board’s authority pursuant to subdivision (b) shall extend to service and compensation issues identified through activities outside the audit function that address compliance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22206.1.
